Mississippi, session 2026, HB1715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and cited as the "Universal Changing Tables Installation Incentive Grant Program Act." SECTION 2. (1)  There is established the Universal Changing Tables Installation Incentive Grant Program for the purpose and intent of providing financial assistance to public and private or commercial entities located within the State of Mississippi to install universal changing tables in one or more restrooms in existing or proposed facilities under its control. (2)  Any state agency, department, municipal or county governing authority exercising ownership and control over any public facility or the owner of any private or commercial building which is accessible to the public, may be entitled to receive grants up to a maximum amount of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each universal changing table installed in one or more restrooms in existing or proposed facilities under its control.  Based upon a determination by the Mississippi Department of Rehabilitation Services, relative to the funds made available for the awarding of grants for the purpose specified in this act, the department may increase or decrease the number of grants awarded accordingly under the authority prescribed in Section 3 of this act. (3)  Grants shall be funded from monies appropriated by the Legislature to the department for that purpose, or any other source of funding made available to the department for purposes of this act.  Grants shall be awarded on the basis of available funds on a first-come, first-served basis, provided that grant applicants satisfy the criteria established by the department for the awarding of grants. (4)  To cover the costs of administering the grant program in accordance with this act, the Department of Rehabilitation Services may receive up to one percent (1%) of any annual appropriation received by the department for the awarding of grants. SECTION 3. (1)  The Mississippi Department of Rehabilitation Services shall administer the Universal Changing Tables Installation Incentive Grant Program and shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  Receiving applications for grants under the grant program; (b)  Determining the eligibility of applicants and paying the grants from any funds available; (c)  Adopting and enforcing appropriate rules and regulations regarding forms designed to be used by applicants for grants and the eligibility of applicants; (d)  Developing criteria for evaluating the growing need for the installation of universal changing tables, including, but not be limited to: (i)  The percentage of the state's population living with a physical disability; and (ii)  The number of existing public and private or commercial facilities currently equipped with a universal changing table; (e)  Developing the administrative policy for the grant program; (f)  Promulgating rules and regulations pertaining to the implementation and operation of the grant program; (g)  Establishing a budget to support the activities of the program and periodically reviewing and, if appropriate, revising the amount of the grants offered through the program; (h)  Any other rules and regulations as the department may deem necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of the grant program; and (i)  Collaborating with the Department of Archives and History and the Department of Finance and Administration to ensure that the integrity of facilities designated as historic landmarks is not compromised by the installation of a universal changing table within such facilities. (2)  When reviewing applications for grant awards, the department shall give priority to applicants whose applications specify that in the installation of the universal changing table, the table is: (a)  Powered and height-adjustable, for safety of the person and caregiver assisting; (b)  Placed in single occupancy restrooms, universal to gender; (c)  Placed in a room with a minimum size of at least  ten (10) feet by fourteen and six-tenths (14.6) feet, which allows for a turning radius of sixty (60) inches for the wheelchair in the middle of the room and thirty-six (36) inches of space at one (1) end of the table; and (d)  Made known to the visitors by the placement of clearly visible signage at the entrance of the building. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.